Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,176
Act; how construed.

The Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act does not prohibit any educational institution from maintaining separate toilet facilities, locker rooms, or living facilities for the different sexes.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1096.